Florida, session 2026, HB4051.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (2) and (3) of section 8 of chapter
2017-221, Laws of Florida, as amended by section 1 of chapter
2024-296, Laws of Florida, are amended to read:
Section 8. Finances.—
(2) The district shall have the authority to levy non-ad
valorem assessments. The methods for assessing and collecting
non-ad valorem assessments, fees, or service charges shall be as
set forth in this charter, chapter 170, Florida Statutes,
chapter 189, Florida Statutes, chapter 191, Florida Statutes,
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4051 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4051, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
and chapter 197, Florida Statutes. However, the district shall
not levy non-ad valorem assessments on a church or religious
institution that is otherwise exempt from ad valorem taxes.
(3)(a) For commercial and industrial properties, the non-
ad valorem assessments shall be calculated using the combined
total square footage of all buildings and structures located on
the parcel, regardless of the number of structures. For
residential properties, the non-ad valorem assessments shall
continue to be applied per residential dwelling unit.
(b) The non-ad valorem assessments may be levied up to the
following maximum amounts:
1.(a) Two hundred fifty dollars for residential properties
up to 1,600 square feet, with an additional $0.13 $0.1544 per
square foot in excess of 1,600 square feet, with the total
assessment levied not to exceed $350.
2.(b) Thirty dollars and 96 cents for vacant land.
3. Five hundred dollars for properties with a
predominantly commercial use code up to 2,500 square feet, with
an additional $0.13 per square foot in excess of 2,500 square
feet.
4.(c) Five hundred dollars for commercial properties with
a predominantly industrial use code up to 2,500 950 square feet,
with an additional $0.13 $0.1544 per square foot in excess of
2,500 950 square feet up to 40,000 square feet, with an
additional $0.05 per square foot in excess of 40,000 square
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4051 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 4051, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
feet.
5.(d) Thirty dollars and 96 cents for unimproved acreage
up to 3 acres, with an additional $10.32 per acre in excess of 3
acres.
(c) For the purposes of this subsection, the term "use
code" shall mean the property use classifications assigned by
the Santa Rosa County Property Appraiser in accordance with the
property use code system established by the Department of
Revenue pursuant to chapter 195, Florida Statutes. The district
shall rely on such classifications, as reflected on the most
recent certified tax roll, when determining the applicable non-
ad valorem assessment.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4051 -02-er